Virginia statutes. Title 35.1. Hotels, Restaurants, Summer Camps, and Campgrounds.
Chapter 2. Regulations.

§ 35.1-11.
Regulations generally.

The Board shall make, adopt, promulgate, and enforce regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this title and to protect the public health and safety. In promulgating regulations, the Board shall consider the accepted standards of health including the use of precautions to prevent the transmission of communicable diseases, hygiene, sanitation, safety, and physical plant management.

History.

1981, c. 468; 1993, c. 336.

§ 35.1-12.
Emergency orders and regulations; Commissioner vested with authority of Board.

The Board may make separate orders and regulations to meet any emergency not provided for by general regulations for the purpose of suppressing conditions dangerous to the public health and communicable, contagious, and infectious diseases.

History.

1981, c. 468.

§ 35.1-13.
Regulations governing hotels.

Regulations of the Board governing hotels shall provide minimum standards for, but shall not be limited to: (i) food preparation and handling; (ii) physical plant sanitation; (iii) the provision, storage, and cleansing of linens and towels; (iv) general housekeeping and maintenance practices; (v) requirements for approved water supply and sewage disposal systems; (vi) vector and pest control; (vii) swimming pools, saunas, and other similar facilities, including personnel standards for the operation thereof; (viii) ice machines and dispensers of perishable food items; and (ix) a procedure for obtaining a license.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 35-8, 35-9, 35-16, 35-16.1, 35-18; 1956, c. 394; 1964, c. 499; 1970, c. 435; 1981, c. 468.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 302 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The State Health Commissioner is authorized to develop, in consultation with the regulated entities, a hotel, campground, and summer camp plan and specification review fee, not to exceed $40.00, a restaurant plan and specification review fee, not to exceed $40.00, an annual hotel, campground, and summer camp permit renewal fee, not to exceed $40.00, and an annual restaurant permit renewal fee, not to exceed $40.00 to be collected from all establishments, except K-12 public schools, that are subject to inspection by the Department of Health pursuant to
§§

35.1-13

,

35.1-14

,

35.1-16

, and

35.1-17

, Code of Virginia. However, any such establishment that is subject to any health permit fee, application fee, inspection fee, risk assessment fee or similar fee imposed by any locality as of January 1, 2002, shall be subject to this annual permit renewal fee only to the extent that the Department of Health fee and the locally imposed fee, when combined, do not exceed the fee amount listed in this paragraph. This fee structure shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of Health and Human Resources.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hotels, Inns and Restaurants, § 6.

§ 35.1-14.
Regulations governing restaurants; advisory standards for exempt entities.

Regulations of the Board governing restaurants shall include but not be limited to the following subjects: (i) a procedure for obtaining a license; (ii) the safe and sanitary maintenance, storage, operation, and use of equipment; (iii) the sanitary maintenance and use of a restaurant’s physical plant; (iv) the safe preparation, handling, protection, and preservation of food, including necessary refrigeration or heating methods; (v) procedures for vector and pest control; (vi) requirements for toilet and cleansing facilities for employees and customers; (vii) requirements for appropriate lighting and ventilation not otherwise provided for in the Uniform Statewide Building Code; (viii) requirements for an approved water supply and sewage disposal system; (ix) personal hygiene standards for employees, particularly those engaged in food handling; (x) the appropriate use of precautions to prevent the transmission of communicable diseases; and (xi) training standards that address food safety and food allergy awareness and safety.

In its regulations, the Board may classify restaurants by type and specify different requirements for each classification.

The Board may adopt any edition of the Food and Drug Administration’s Food Code, or supplement thereto, or any portion thereof, as regulations, with any amendments as it deems appropriate. In addition, the Board may repeal or amend any regulation adopted pursuant to this subsection. No regulations adopted or amended by the Board pursuant to this subsection, however, shall establish requirements for any license, permit, or inspection unless such license, permit, or inspection is otherwise provided for in this title. The provisions of the Food and Drug Administration’s Food Code shall not apply to farmers selling their own farm-produced products directly to consumers for their personal use, whether such sales occur on such farmer’s farm or at a farmers’ market, unless such provisions are adopted in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

The Board may issue advisory standards for the safe preparation, handling, protection, and preservation of food by entities exempt from the provisions of this title pursuant to §

35.1-25

or

35.1-26

.

The provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) shall not apply to the adoption of any regulation pursuant to subsection C if the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services adopts the same edition of the Food Code, or the same portions thereof, pursuant to subsection B of § 3.2-5121 and the regulations adopted by the Board and the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services have the same effective date. In the event that the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services adopts regulations pursuant to §

2.2-4012.1

, the effective date of the Board’s regulations may be any date on or after the effective date of the regulations adopted by the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

Notwithstanding any exemption to the contrary, a regulation promulgated pursuant to subsection C shall be subject to the requirements set out in §§

2.2-4007.03

,

2.2-4007.04

, and

2.2-4007.05

, and shall be published in the Virginia Register of Regulations. After the close of the 60-day comment period, the Board may adopt a final regulation, with or without changes. Such regulation shall become effective 15 days after publication in the Virginia Register, unless the Board has withdrawn or suspended the regulation, or a later date has been set by the Board. The Board shall also hold at least one public hearing on the proposed regulation during the 60-day comment period. The notice for such public hearing shall include the date, time and place of the hearing.

The Board shall adopt regulations pursuant to subsection C that allow the receipt for sale or service of rabbits that are slaughtered or processed in a facility that complies with regulations adopted by the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant to the provisions of subsection H of § 3.2-5121.

Regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to this section shall not require an establishment that sells only prepared foods to have a certified food protection manager, as defined in §

35.1-1

, on site during all hours of operation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 35-28, 35-32, 35-33, 35-34, 35-35, 35-36, 35-37; 1981, c. 468; 1993, c. 336; 2003, c. 695; 2004, c. 802; 2007, cc. 873, 916; 2015, cc. 356, 528; 2018, c. 674; 2022, c. 393.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2004, c. 802, cl. 2 provides: “That the Rules and Regulations Pertaining to the Sanitary and Operating Procedures in Retail Food Stores adopted by the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services in effect as of July 1, 2004, shall remain in effect until the effective date of new regulations that have been adopted by the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant to subsection B of
§ 3.1-398.”

Effective October 1, 2008, in subsection E, the reference to “subsection B of
§ 3.1-398” was changed to “subsection B of
§ 3.2-5121” at the direction of the Code Commission to reflect the recodification of Title 3.1.

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 302 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The State Health Commissioner is authorized to develop, in consultation with the regulated entities, a hotel, campground, and summer camp plan and specification review fee, not to exceed $40.00, a restaurant plan and specification review fee, not to exceed $40.00, an annual hotel, campground, and summer camp permit renewal fee, not to exceed $40.00, and an annual restaurant permit renewal fee, not to exceed $40.00 to be collected from all establishments, except K-12 public schools, that are subject to inspection by the Department of Health pursuant to
§§

35.1-13

,

35.1-14

,

35.1-16

, and

35.1-17

, Code of Virginia. However, any such establishment that is subject to any health permit fee, application fee, inspection fee, risk assessment fee or similar fee imposed by any locality as of January 1, 2002, shall be subject to this annual permit renewal fee only to the extent that the Department of Health fee and the locally imposed fee, when combined, do not exceed the fee amount listed in this paragraph. This fee structure shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of Health and Human Resources.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 695 redesignated former subsection C as present subsection D and added present subsections C and E.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 802 in subsection C, substituted “The Board may adopt any edition of the Food and Drug Administration’s Food Code,
or supplement thereto, or any portion thereof, as regulations, with any amendments as it deems appropriate,” for
“The Board may adopt the Food and Drug Administration’s Food Code, or portions thereof, amending or modifying it as necessary, within 280 days of the release of the most current Food Code, or any amendments thereto, issued by the Food and Drug Administration,” added the second sentence and inserted “or amended” in the third sentence; and in subsection E, deleted “within the same 280-day period” in the first sentence, added the language beginning “and the regulations adopted” at the end of the first paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 873 and 916 are identical, substituted “§§

2.2-4007

.03,

2.2-4007

.04, and

2.2-4007.05

” for “subsections F, H, and I of § 2.2-4007” in the final paragraph and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 356 and 528 are identical, and added clause (xi) of subdivision A and made related changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 674 added subsection F.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 393 added subsection G.

§ 35.1-14.1.
Certain uses of sulfiting agents prohibited.

The use of sulfiting agents as preservatives on raw fruits and vegetables is prohibited. No restaurant licensed under this title shall direct or allow its employees or agents to apply sulfiting agents on raw fruits and vegetables prepared for or served to the public.

History.

1986, c. 200.

§ 35.1-14.2.
Donations of food to charitable organizations.

Any restaurant, licensed by the Department of Health pursuant to this title and any processor, distributor, wholesaler or retailer of food, including, but not limited to, a grocery, convenience, or other store selling food or food products, may donate unserved excess foods to any charity organization that is exempt from taxation under. § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and to political subdivisions for distribution to needy persons. Charitable organizations engaged in food distribution programs for needy persons shall notify the local political subdivision of their programs. Upon the notification of such food distribution programs by such charitable organizations, the local political subdivision shall provide a list of such charitable organizations within its jurisdiction to those restaurants and other food suppliers who request such information. Organizations engaged in such food distribution programs shall be exempt from civil liability as provided in § 3.2-5144 for the donors of the food.

Charitable organizations engaged in food distribution programs for needy persons shall be deemed exempt from state and local regulations and local ordinances that govern food service and preparation. In addition to accepting donations of food as provided in subsection A, such organizations may accept food prepared by their employees or volunteers in private homes or in facilities not otherwise licensed as provided in this chapter.

For the purposes of this subsection, “charitable organizations” shall include nonprofit homeless shelters and hunger prevention programs.

No food donor or food organization, as defined in § 3.2-5144, shall be criminally or civilly liable for donating or receiving (i) commercially processed food past the best-by or sell-by date as long as the food meets all labeling and date requirements or (ii) date-marked prepared foods not past the marked disposition date, when the marked date does not exceed seven calendar days from the date of preparation, and the day of preparation is counted as day one. The exemption of this section shall not apply if injury or death directly results from the gross negligence or intentional misconduct of the donor or donee.

The Board may issue advisory standards for the safe preparation, handling, protection, and preservation of food by the organizations exempted in subsection B.

History.

1990, c. 755; 1998, c. 641; 2007, cc. 404, 545; 2022, c. 633.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Code Commission, the reference in subsection A to
§ 3.2-5144 was substituted for
§ 3.1-418.1, due to the recodification of Title 3.1, effective October 1, 2008.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “including, but not limited to, a grocery, convenience or other store selling food or food products” for “inspected by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant to Chapter 20 (§ 3.1-361 et seq.) and Chapter 21 (§ 3.1-420 et seq.) of Title 3.1” and in the last sentence, added “for the donors of the food.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by c. 404, effective March 15, 2007, and c. 545, effective March 19, 2007, are identical, and deleted the former subsection B, which required that charitable food distribution programs comply with regulations, and added present subsections B and C.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 633 substituted “§ 501(c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code” for “26 U.S.C. § 501(c) (3)” in subsection A; added subsection C; and redesignated accordingly.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Food prepared in home or church for charitable purposes. —

A private kitchen in a home or church is not subject to food preparation and service requirements of the State Health Commissioner when the kitchen is used to prepare food to donate to a charitable organization, where the charitable organization is engaged in a food distribution program for the needy. However, the Board of Health may issue advisory guidelines, which reasonably should be considered by those preparing the food. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Mark D. Sickles, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 15-063, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (7/22/16).

§ 35.1-15.
Training materials.

The Commissioner shall cause to be written materials designed to provide information on training for the prevention of disease transmission, symptoms of communicable disease, personal hygiene practices, hazards in food preparation, food safety and food allergy awareness and safety, and any other matter deemed appropriate by the Commissioner for the training of restaurant personnel. The Commissioner may, if he desires, provide personnel for the training of employees of restaurants in the handling of food.

History.

1981, c. 468; 2015, cc. 356, 528.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 356 and 528 are identical, and inserted “food safety and food allergy awareness and safety” in the first sentence.

§ 35.1-15.1.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Required human trafficking training.

As used in this section:

“Employee”
means any person employed by a hotel that (i) has frequent or regular interactions with guests, such as front desk staff, hotel porters, hotel concierge, restaurant waiting and bartending staff, or room service staff; (ii) is in a management position; or (iii) has access to the guest’s room, including housekeeping staff.

“Hotel”
does not include a short-term rental property as defined in §

58.1-3510.4

.

Every hotel proprietor shall require its employees to complete a training course on recognizing and reporting instances of suspected human trafficking. Such training course shall be an online course provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Services at no cost to the hotel proprietor and its employees pursuant to §

9.1-102

or an alternative online or in-person training course approved by the Department of Criminal Justice Services. The Department of Criminal Justice Services shall approve or disapprove of the use of any alternative online or in-person training course within 60 days of the submission of such training course for approval.

Each hotel employee shall complete the required training course described in subsection B within six months of being employed by a hotel and thereafter at least once during each consecutive period of two calendar years commencing with the date on which he last completed the required training course, for as long as he is employed by a hotel.

History.

2022, c. 751.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 751, cl. 3 provides: “That, notwithstanding subsection C of
§

35.1-15.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, any individual employed by a hotel as of January 1, 2023, shall complete the required training course on recognizing and reporting instances of suspected human trafficking no later than June 30, 2023.”

Acts
2022, c. 751, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 35.1-16.
Regulations governing summer camps.

The regulations of the Board governing summer camps shall include, but not be limited to: (i) an approved drinking water supply; (ii) an approved sewage disposal system; (iii) an approved solid waste disposal system; (iv) the adequate and sanitary preparation, handling, protection and preservation of food; (v) the proper maintenance of buildings, grounds, and equipment; (vi) vector and pest control; (vii) toilet, swimming, and bathing facilities, including shower facilities; (viii) a procedure for obtaining a license.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 35-45, 35-46, 35-47, 35-48, 35-49; 1981, c. 468.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 302 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The State Health Commissioner is authorized to develop, in consultation with the regulated entities, a hotel, campground, and summer camp plan and specification review fee, not to exceed $40.00, a restaurant plan and specification review fee, not to exceed $40.00, an annual hotel, campground, and summer camp permit renewal fee, not to exceed $40.00, and an annual restaurant permit renewal fee, not to exceed $40.00 to be collected from all establishments, except K-12 public schools, that are subject to inspection by the Department of Health pursuant to
§§

35.1-13

,

35.1-14

,

35.1-16

, and

35.1-17

, Code of Virginia. However, any such establishment that is subject to any health permit fee, application fee, inspection fee, risk assessment fee or similar fee imposed by any locality as of January 1, 2002, shall be subject to this annual permit renewal fee only to the extent that the Department of Health fee and the locally imposed fee, when combined, do not exceed the fee amount listed in this paragraph. This fee structure shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of Health and Human Resources.”

§ 35.1-17.
Regulations governing campgrounds.

The regulations of the Board governing campgrounds shall include minimum standards for (i) an approved drinking water supply; (ii) an approved sewage disposal system; (iii) an approved solid waste disposal system; (iv) the proper maintenance of buildings, grounds, and equipment; (v) vector and pest control; (vi) toilet, swimming, and bathing facilities, including shower facilities; (vii) effective measures for the control of animals and pets; (viii) appropriate procedures and safeguards for hazardous situations, including specifically the maintenance and sale of propane gas or other explosives and combustibles; and (ix) a procedure for obtaining a license.

The Board may in its sole discretion prescribe regulations for classes of campgrounds and different requirements for each class.

History.

Code 1950, § 35-55; 1981, c. 468.

Cross references.

For provisions as to membership camping, see § 59.1-311 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 302 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The State Health Commissioner is authorized to develop, in consultation with the regulated entities, a hotel, campground, and summer camp plan and specification review fee, not to exceed $40.00, a restaurant plan and specification review fee, not to exceed $40.00, an annual hotel, campground, and summer camp permit renewal fee, not to exceed $40.00, and an annual restaurant permit renewal fee, not to exceed $40.00 to be collected from all establishments, except K-12 public schools, that are subject to inspection by the Department of Health pursuant to
§§

35.1-13

,

35.1-14

,

35.1-16

, and

35.1-17

, Code of Virginia. However, any such establishment that is subject to any health permit fee, application fee, inspection fee, risk assessment fee or similar fee imposed by any locality as of January 1, 2002, shall be subject to this annual permit renewal fee only to the extent that the Department of Health fee and the locally imposed fee, when combined, do not exceed the fee amount listed in this paragraph. This fee structure shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of Health and Human Resources.”